Maryland, session 2025, HB0018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–321.
(a) In this section, “recorded images” has the meaning stated in § 21–202.1, §
21–809, § 21–810, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
– 1 –

Ch. 712 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
(3) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article; [or]
(4) A NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED UNDER §
22–612 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; OR
(5) a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:
(1) as required in § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article;
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, §
22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the
person; or
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under § 21–202.1, §
21–809, § 21–810, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 624 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
[2025] 2027, a county that authorizes a program of noise abatement monitoring systems
under this Act shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on:
(1) through October 1, [2025] 2027:
(i) the time period during which noise abatement monitoring
systems were in use in the county; and
(ii) the number of warnings and citations issued as a result of
violations recorded by noise abatement monitoring systems in the county over the reported
time period, by location and date;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 712
(2) (i) the costs associated with implementing and operating noise
abatement monitoring systems; and
(ii) the revenue collected on a monthly basis as a result of violations
recorded by noise abatement monitoring systems;
(3) appropriate locations for the deployment of noise abatement monitoring
systems;
(4) the performance and reliability of noise abatement monitoring systems
used by the county; and
(5) the effectiveness of noise abatement monitoring systems in reducing
noise produced by motor vehicles in the county and in areas where the systems were
implemented and used.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [2] 4 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2026] 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Chapter 625 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
[2025] 2027, a county that authorizes a program of noise abatement monitoring systems
under this Act shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on:
(1) through October 1, [2025] 2027:
(i) the time period during which noise abatement monitoring
systems were in use in the county; and
(ii) the number of warnings and citations issued as a result of
violations recorded by noise abatement monitoring systems in the county over the reported
time period, by location and date;
(2) (i) the costs associated with implementing and operating noise
abatement monitoring systems; and
(ii) the revenue collected on a monthly basis as a result of violations
recorded by noise abatement monitoring systems;
(3) appropriate locations for the deployment of noise abatement monitoring
systems;
– 3 –

Ch. 712 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) the performance and reliability of noise abatement monitoring systems
used by the county; and
(5) the effectiveness of noise abatement monitoring systems in reducing
noise produced by motor vehicles in the county and in areas where the systems were
implemented and used.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [2] 4 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2026] 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2028, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –